Washington statutes.
RCW 35.36.070

Revocation of proxy.

Any designation of a proxy may be revoked by written notice addressed to the governing body of the city signed by the officer who made the designation and filed and recorded in the same manner as the notice of designation. It shall be effective from the time of its recording but shall not affect the validity of any signature theretofore made.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.36.070. Prior: 1929 c 212 s 2, part; RRS s 9005-6, part.]